California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) If a local entity limits or prohibits oil and gas operations or development of an owner or operator pursuant to subdivision (a), the owner or operator shall be responsible for plugging and abandoning its wells, decommissioning attendant production facilities, and related measures, pursuant to the rules of this division.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local entity” means a city, county, or city and county, including a charter city, county, and city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 550, Sec. 2.   (AB 3233)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.5.

Acting with the approval of the director, the supervisor may annually expend, from the amount appropriated to the division, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to support activities at the West Kern Oil Museum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 731, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3107.

A district deputy in each district, designated by the supervisor, shall collect all necessary information regarding the oil and gas wells in the district, with a view to determining the presence of oil and gas sands and the location and extent of strata bearing water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes that might be affected. The district deputy shall prepare maps and other accessories necessary to determine the presence of oil and gas sands and the location and extent of strata bearing water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes or surface water suitable for those purposes. This work shall be done with the view to advising the operators as to the best means of protecting the oil and gas sands and the water-bearing strata and surface water, and with a view to aiding the supervisor in ordering tests or repair work at wells. All this data shall be kept on file in the office of the district deputy of the respective district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 278, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3108.

(a) On or before the first day of October of each year the supervisor shall make public, for the benefit of all interested persons, a report in writing showing:

(1) The total amounts of oil and gas produced in each county in the state during the previous calendar year.

(2) The total cost of the division for the previous fiscal year, including an accounting of any General Fund moneys appropriated and used for plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of facilities, and site remediation, or appropriated and used to facilitate those activities.

(3) The total amount delinquent and uncollected from any assessments or charges levied pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The report shall also include such other information as the supervisor deems advisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3108.5.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the supervisor shall make all public information collected or maintained by the division, with priority given to well records, well logs, notices of intention, supplementary notices, field reports, inspection reports,
 correspondence, and other materials, readily available to the public on the division’s internet website, except well records required to be held as confidential information pursuant to Section 3234. All online materials shall be organized by well, operator, or project, and searchable.

(2) On or before July 1, 2024, the supervisor shall make all notices of violation and orders of the supervisor readily available to the public on the
 division’s internet website.

(b) The supervisor shall make continuous progress towards meeting the requirements of subdivision (a) and the materials readily available to the public online shall steadily increase. Priority shall be given to public information regarding well records, well logs, notices of intention, notices of violation, supplementary notices, field reports, inspection reports, and correspondence previously available on the division’s internet website and documents associated with wells that have not been plugged and abandoned.

(c) (1) The supervisor shall, commencing July 1, 2023, provide an annual update to the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water on progress made toward meeting the requirements of subdivision (a).

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3109.

The supervisor may publish any publications, reports, maps, or other printed matter relating to oil and gas, for which there may be public demand. If these publications, reports, maps, or other printed matter are sold, they shall be sold at cost, and the proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 10.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3110.

All money paid to the Treasurer pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 3400) shall be deposited to the credit of the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury, for expenditure as provided in Section 3401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 11.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

(a) All money received in repayment of repair work done as provided in this chapter shall be returned and credited to the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund for expenditure as provided in Section 3401.

(b) All miscellaneous revenues from oil and gas wells and from real and personal property acquired by the supervisor in the course of carrying out this chapter shall be credited to the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund for expenditure as provided in Section 3401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 12.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, on and after January 1, 1980, the supervisor or the Division of Oil and Gas shall not adopt nor publish a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from such provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

3113.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the division shall, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, annually prepare and transmit to the Legislature a report of all of the following information statewide and by district:

(1) The number of shall-witness and may-witness operations performed.
 The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(2) The number of shall-witness and may-witness operations performed that were witnessed by the
 division in person. The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(3) The number of shall witness and may-witness operations performed where division personnel did not witness the operations in person and witnessed the operations remotely. The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(4) The number of
 shall-witness and may-witness operations performed on critical wells.
 The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(5) The number of shall-witness and may-witness operations performed on critical wells that were witnessed by the
 division in person. The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(6) The number of shall-witness and may-witness operations performed on critical wells where division personnel did not witness the operations in person and witnessed the operations remotely. The number of each type of may-witness operation as identified by law or regulation included in the total shall be provided.

(7) A complete list of all shall-witness operations where division personnel did not witness the operations in person and witnessed the operations remotely. Information about each operation,
 including, but not limited to, the type of operation, the date, location, API number, and district, shall be included. The division shall maintain a written justification for each remote witnessing of shall-witness operations and provide it upon request.

(b) (1) The division is authorized to witness may-witness operations remotely. The division shall prioritize witnessing of may-witness operations in person to the maximum extent possible.

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(c) The supervisor may, only in writing and only on a case-by-case basis, authorize division personnel to witness shall-witness operations remotely. The supervisor shall not delegate the authority to approve witnessing of these shall-witness operations remotely. All written authorizations for division personnel to witness shall-witness operations remotely shall be maintained and available to the public upon request.

(d) The supervisor shall not set any positive numerical quotas for division personnel to witness operations remotely. The supervisor shall not provide a blanket authorization for remote witnessing of shall-witness operations. The supervisor shall provide written guidance to division personnel on minimum standards for remote witnessing of shall-witness and may-witness
 operations.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Critical well” has the same meaning as in Section 1720 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, or a successor regulation.

(2) “May-witness” means an operation performed that by law the division is authorized to witness.

(3) “Shall-witness” means an operation performed that by law the division is required to witness.

(4) “Witnessed by the division in person” means the operation is witnessed by division personnel who were physically present at the location when the operation was performed.

(5) “Witnessed the operations remotely” or “witness the operations remotely” or “witnessing the operations remotely” means the viewing or reviewing of video, livestream, photographic, or other materials or evidence of the conduct of the operation during or after the operation was conducted without the division personnel being physically present at the location when the operation was performed.

(f) It is the policy of the state that
 division personnel witness operations in person that are critical to ensuring public and environmental health and safety, that the presence of division personnel in the field to regularly observe operations under the division’s jurisdiction is of utmost importance, and that division staffing levels be set and maintained to ensure this policy is met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 16.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3114.

(a) By July 30, 2019, and annually thereafter, the Department of Conservation, in consultation with the State Water Resources Control Board, shall report to the fiscal and relevant policy committees of the Legislature on the Underground Injection Control Program. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following about activities in the previous 12 months:

(1) The number and location of underground injection control project approvals issued by the department, including projects that were approved but subsequently lapsed without having commenced injection.

(2) The monthly average number of pending project applications.

(3) The average length of time to obtain an underground injection control project approval from date of receipt of complete application to the date of issuance.

(4) The average amount of time to review an underground injection control project proposal by the division and the average combined review time by the State Water Resources Control Board and regional water quality control boards for each proposed underground injection control project.

(5) The number of project proposals pending for over one year.

(6) A list of pending aquifer exemptions, if any, and their status in the review process.

(7) The average length of time to process an aquifer exemption and the average amount of time to review a proposed aquifer exemption by the division
 and the average combined review time by the State Water Resources Control Board and regional water quality control boards for each aquifer exemption proposal.

(8) The number and description of underground injection control related violations identified.

(9) The number of enforcement actions taken by the department.

(10) The number of shut-in orders or requests to relinquish permits and the status of those orders or requests.

(11) The number, classification, and location of staff with work related to underground injection control.

(12) The number of staff vacancies for positions associated with underground injection control.

(13) Any state or federal legislation, administrative, or rulemaking changes to the program.

(14) The number of underground injection control projects reviewed for compliance with statutes and regulations in each district and a summary of findings from project reviews completed during the reporting period, including any steps taken to address identified deficiencies.

(15) The number of underground injection control projects that have not been reviewed for compliance with applicable statutes and regulations within the prior two years.

(16) Summary of significant milestones in their compliance schedule agreed to with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as indicated in the March 9, 2015, letter to the division and the state board from the United States Environmental Protection Agency,
 including, but not limited to, regulatory updates, evaluations of injection wells, and aquifer exemption applications.

(17) Summary of activities undertaken by the underground injection control review panel established pursuant to Section 46 of Chapter 24 of the Statutes of 2015.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2029, and, as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Section inoperative October 1, 2029.    Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3115.

On or before July 1, 2023, the division shall develop and implement an education and outreach program to provide training to local governmental entities on materials collected and maintained by the division related to oil and gas operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 4.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund: Labor Standards for Funding [3125. - 3125.3.]

3125.

All work to plug and abandon wells, decommission production facilities, or otherwise remediate well sites that is undertaken, funded, or financed by the division pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255 and performed by outside contractors is public work for which prevailing wages shall be paid for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3125.1.

(a) Not later than June 30, 2024, the California Workforce Development Board shall consult with the division in developing and implementing the Oil and Gas Well Capping Pilot initiative established pursuant to the Budget Act of 2022 to assist state-registered apprenticeship programs in creating curriculum for training apprentices and to upskill journeypersons on well capping projects.

(b) The division and other public agencies that receive funds from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund pursuant to this chapter shall consult and coordinate with the California Workforce Development Board when promoting or seeking to improve workforce education and training programs for incumbent and entry-level workers that support or advance high-quality work performance and
 increase priority populations’ access to high-quality jobs associated with projects involving the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255.

(c) In developing and implementing workforce development programs to support projects involving the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255, the board, division, and other public agencies shall align with the principles and practices of the high road, high road training partnerships, and high road construction careers as defined in subdivisions (r) to (t), inclusive, of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3125.2.

(a) The division, with assistance from the Labor and Workforce Development Agency, shall develop a procurement process to group multiple projects involving the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255, to use project labor agreements under which to deliver those projects.

(b) The division, when contracting on or after January 1, 2028, for the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating
 well sites pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255, shall ensure that all entities selected for these projects enter into a project labor agreement that will bind all of the contractors performing work on the project. For purposes of this section, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3125.3.

(a) This section applies only to work performed by contractors licensed by the Contractors State License Board under contracts for the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites, pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255, that are awarded, extended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2028.

(b) The division, when contracting for the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging, and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites pursuant to Section 3226 or 3255, shall require that contractors and any
 subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) The requirements of this section are satisfied if all contractors and subcontractors for the performance of construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or work, including the plugging and abandonment of wells, decommissioning of production facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites, are required to become bound to a multicraft project labor agreement that expressly requires each contractor and subcontractor performing the work to use a skilled and trained workforce. For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 844, Sec. 2.   (SB 1295)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Underground Injection Control [3130. - 3132.]

3130.

For purposes of this article, the following terms mean the following:

(a) “Beneficial use” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(b) “Class II well” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 144.6 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Exempted aquifer” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 144.3 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) “State board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(e) “Underground Injection Control Program” means a program covering Class II wells for which the division has received primacy from the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 1425 of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300h-4).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 29.   (SB 83)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3131.

(a) To ensure the appropriateness of a proposal by the state for an exempted aquifer determination subject to any conditions on the subsequent injection of fluids, and before proposing to the United States Environmental Protection Agency that it exempt an aquifer or portion of an aquifer pursuant to Section 144.7 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the division shall consult with the appropriate regional water quality control board and the state board concerning the conformity of the proposal with all of the following:

(1) The
 criteria set forth in Section 146.4 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The injection of fluids will not affect the quality of water that is, or may reasonably be, used for any beneficial use.

(3) The injected fluid will remain in the aquifer or portion of the aquifer that would be exempted.

(b) Based on the consultation pursuant to subdivision (a), if the division and the staff of the state board preliminarily concur that an aquifer or portion of an aquifer may merit consideration for exemption by the United States Environmental Protection Agency,
 the division and the staff of the state board shall provide a public comment period and, with a minimum of 30 days’ public notice, and shall jointly conduct a public hearing.

(c) Following review of the public comments pursuant to subdivision (b) and only if the division and the staff of the state
 board concur that the exemption proposal merits consideration for exemption, the
 staff of the state board shall submit a report to the state board evaluating the exemption proposal’s consistency with the criteria set forth in subdivision (a), including an analysis of all potential conduits, that shall be made available to the public no fewer than 60 days prior to a meeting before the state board and subject to a 45-day public comment period.

(d) The state board shall consider, in a public meeting, the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) and shall determine whether it concurs that the exemption proposal, with any appropriate modifications, complies with the requirements specified in subdivision (a) and merits consideration for exemption.

(e) If the state board concurs pursuant to subdivision (d), the division shall submit the aquifer exemption proposal to the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3132.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Carbon dioxide capture project” means a project that uses a process to separate carbon dioxide from industrial, commercial, or energy-related sources, other than oil or gas production from a well, and produces a concentrated fluid of carbon dioxide with the intent of preventing emission of the carbon dioxide into the atmosphere.

(2) “Carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project” means a carbon dioxide capture project or carbon dioxide removal project, that seeks to provide for the long-term isolation or utilization of the carbon dioxide from the atmosphere through storage in a geologic formation.

(3) “Carbon dioxide removal project” means a project that uses a process to remove carbon dioxide from the atmosphere. 

(4) “Concentrated carbon dioxide fluid” means a fluid that contains concentrated carbon dioxide that is proportionately greater than the ambient atmospheric concentration of carbon dioxide.

(b) An operator shall not inject a concentrated carbon dioxide fluid produced by a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project into a Class II well for purposes of enhanced oil recovery, including the facilitation of enhanced oil recovery from another well.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 4.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Well Stimulation [3150. - 3161.]

3150.

“Additive” means a substance or combination of substances added to a base fluid for purposes of preparing well stimulation treatment fluid which includes, but is not limited to, an acid stimulation treatment fluid or a hydraulic fracturing fluid. An additive may, but is not required to, serve additional purposes beyond the transmission of hydraulic pressure to the geologic formation. An additive may be of any phase and includes proppants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3151.

“Base fluid” means the continuous phase fluid used in the makeup of a well stimulation treatment fluid, including, but not limited to, an acid stimulation treatment fluid or a hydraulic fracturing fluid. The continuous phase fluid may include, but is not limited to, water, and may be a liquid or a hydrocarbon or nonhydrocarbon gas. A well stimulation treatment may use more than one base fluid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3152.

“Hydraulic fracturing” means a well stimulation treatment that, in whole or in part, includes the pressurized injection of hydraulic fracturing fluid or fluids into an underground geologic formation in order to fracture or with the intent to fracture the formation, thereby causing or enhancing, for the purposes of this division, the production of oil or gas from a well.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3153.

“Well stimulation treatment fluid” means a base fluid mixed with physical and chemical additives, which may include acid, for the purpose of a well stimulation treatment. A well stimulation treatment may include more than one well stimulation treatment fluid. Well stimulation treatment fluids include, but are not limited to, hydraulic fracturing fluids and acid stimulation treatment fluids.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3154.

“Proppants” means materials inserted or injected into the underground geologic formation that are intended to prevent fractures from closing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3155.

“Supplier” means an entity performing a well stimulation treatment or an entity supplying an additive or proppant directly to the operator for use in a well stimulation treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3156.

“Surface property owner” means the owner of real property as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll or, if more recent information than the information contained on the assessment roll is available, the owner of record according to the county assessor or tax collector.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3157.

(a) For purposes of this article, “well stimulation treatment” means any treatment of a well designed to enhance oil and gas production or recovery by increasing the permeability of the formation. Well stimulation treatments include, but are not limited to, hydraulic fracturing treatments and acid well stimulation treatments.

(b) Well stimulation treatments do not include steam flooding, water flooding, or cyclic steaming and do not include routine well cleanout work, routine well maintenance, routine removal of formation damage due to drilling, bottom hole pressure surveys, or routine activities that do not affect the integrity of the well or the formation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3158.

“Acid well stimulation treatment” means a well stimulation treatment that uses, in whole or in part, the application of one or more acids to the well or underground geologic formation. The acid well stimulation treatment may be at any applied pressure and may be used in combination with hydraulic fracturing treatments or other well stimulation treatments. Acid well stimulation treatments include acid matrix stimulation treatments and acid fracturing treatments. Acid matrix stimulation treatments are acid treatments conducted at pressures lower than the applied pressure necessary to fracture the underground geologic formation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3159.

“Flowback fluid” means the fluid recovered from the treated well before the commencement of oil and gas production from that well following a well stimulation treatment. The flowback fluid may include materials of any phase.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (SB 4)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3160.

(a) On or before January 1, 2015, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall cause to be conducted, and completed, an independent scientific study on well stimulation treatments, including, but not limited to, hydraulic fracturing and acid well stimulation treatments. The scientific study shall evaluate the hazards and risks and potential hazards and risks that well stimulation treatments pose to natural resources and public, occupational, and environmental health and safety. The scientific study shall do all of the following:

(1) Follow the well-established standard protocols of the scientific profession, including, but not limited to, the use of recognized experts, peer
 review, and publication.

(2) Identify areas with existing and potential conventional and unconventional oil and gas reserves where well stimulation treatments are likely to spur or enable oil and gas exploration and production.

(3) (A) Evaluate all aspects and effects of well stimulation treatments, including, but not limited to, the well stimulation treatment, additive and water transportation to and from the well site, mixing and handling of the well stimulation treatment fluids and additives onsite, the use and potential for use of nontoxic additives and the use or reuse of treated or produced water in well stimulation treatment fluids, and flowback fluids and the handling, treatment, and disposal of flowback fluids and other materials, if any,
 generated by the treatment. Specifically, the potential for the use of recycled water in well stimulation treatments, including appropriate water quality requirements and available treatment
 technologies, shall be evaluated. Well stimulation treatments include, but are not limited to, hydraulic fracturing and acid well stimulation treatments.

(B) Review and evaluate acid matrix stimulation treatments, including the range of acid volumes applied per treated foot and total acid volumes used in treatments, types of acids, acid concentration, and other chemicals used in the treatments.

(4) Consider, at a minimum, atmospheric emissions, including potential greenhouse gas emissions, the potential degradation of air quality, potential impacts on wildlife, native plants, and habitat, including habitat fragmentation, potential water and surface contamination, potential noise pollution, induced seismicity, and the ultimate disposition, transport, transformation, and
 toxicology of well stimulation treatments, including acid well stimulation fluids, hydraulic fracturing fluids, and waste hydraulic fracturing fluids and acid well stimulation in the environment.

(5) Identify and evaluate the geologic features present in the vicinity of a well, including the wellbore, that should be taken into consideration in the design of a proposed well stimulation treatment.

(6) Include a hazard assessment and risk analysis addressing occupational and environmental exposures to well stimulation treatments, including hydraulic fracturing treatments, hydraulic fracturing treatment-related processes, acid well stimulation treatments, acid well stimulation treatment-related processes, and the corresponding impacts on public health and safety with the participation
 of the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(7) Clearly identify where additional information is necessary to inform and improve the analyses.

(b) (1) (A) On or before January 1, 2015, the division, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the State Air Resources Board, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, and any local air districts and regional water quality control boards in areas where well stimulation treatments, including acid well stimulation treatments and hydraulic fracturing treatments, may occur, shall adopt rules and regulations specific to well stimulation treatments. The rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited
 to, revisions, as needed, to the rules and regulations governing construction of wells and well casings to ensure integrity of wells, well casings, and the geologic and hydrologic isolation of the oil and gas formation during and following well stimulation treatments, and full disclosure of the composition and disposition of well stimulation fluids, including, but not limited to, hydraulic fracturing fluids, acid well stimulation fluids, and flowback fluids.

(B) The rules and regulations shall additionally include provisions for an independent entity or person to perform the notification requirements pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (d), for the operator to provide for baseline and followup water testing upon request as specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (d).

(C) (i) In order to identify the acid matrix stimulation treatments that are subject to this section, the rules and regulations shall establish threshold values for acid volume applied per treated foot of any individual stage of the well or for total acid volume of the treatment, or both, based upon a quantitative assessment of the risks posed by acid matrix stimulation treatments that exceed the specified threshold value or values in order to prevent, as far as possible, damage to life, health, property, and natural resources pursuant to Section 3106.

(ii) On or before January 1, 2020, the division shall review and evaluate the threshold values for acid volume applied per treated foot and total acid volume of the treatment, based upon data collected in the state, for acid matrix stimulation treatments. The division
 shall revise the values through the regulatory process, if necessary, based upon the best available scientific information, including the results of the independent scientific study pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) Full disclosure of the composition and disposition of well stimulation fluids, including, but not limited to, hydraulic fracturing fluids and acid stimulation treatment fluids, shall, at a minimum,
 include:

(A) The date of the well stimulation treatment.

(B) A complete list of the names, Chemical Abstract Service (CAS) numbers, and maximum concentration, in percent by mass, of each and every chemical constituent of the well stimulation treatment fluids used. If a CAS number does not exist for a chemical constituent, the well owner or operator may provide another unique identifier, if available.

(C) The trade name, the supplier, concentration, and a brief description of the intended purpose of each additive contained in the well stimulation treatment fluid.

(D) The total volume of base fluid used during the well stimulation treatment,
 and the identification of whether the base fluid is water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, water not suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, or a fluid other than water.

(E) The source, volume, and specific composition and disposition of all water, including, but not limited to, all water used as base fluid during the well stimulation treatment and recovered from the well following the well stimulation treatment that is not otherwise reported as produced water pursuant to Section 3227. Any repeated reuse of treated or untreated water for well stimulation treatments and well stimulation treatment-related activities shall be identified.

(F) The specific composition and disposition of all well stimulation treatment fluids, including waste fluids, other than water.

(G) Any radiological components or tracers injected into the well as part of, or in order to evaluate, the well stimulation treatment, a description of the recovery method, if any, for those components or tracers, the recovery rate, and specific disposal information for recovered components or tracers.

(H) The radioactivity of the recovered well stimulation fluids.

(I) The location of the portion of the well subject to the well stimulation treatment and the extent of the fracturing or other modification, if any, surrounding the well induced by the treatment.
